Hawaii, session 2026, HB763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that civic education prepares students to participate in the public and political lives of their communities.  Teaching students about the importance of civic engagement through civic education helps develop critical thinking skills that are vital to the functioning of a democratic nation, including how to recognize social problems, evaluate possible solutions to problems, separate evidence-based claims from opinions, and act upon what is learned. The legislature further finds that in the 2020 general election, forty states had a higher voter turnout than did Hawaii, which placed Hawaii among the ten states with the lowest voter turnout in the nation.  The legislature also finds that cultivating social and political engagement among students through civic education is an important strategy available to increase voter turnout and citizen engagement over the long term. The legislature additionally finds that in 2018, the board of education adopted the Hawaii core standards in social studies.  These core standards outline the content, concepts, and inquiry skills students need to reason, wonder, and think about the vastness and richness of the human condition.  The Hawaii core standards in social studies also integrate and encompass the democratic values, civility, and global perspective needed to support the development of critical thinking and habits of mind that are the hallmark of a mature, community-minded citizen.  The standards are also premised upon a rigorous and relevant K-12 social studies experience. The legislature finds that engaging students in the pursuit of active and informed citizenship will connect students to the world through informed instructional experiences that are led by teachers who are committed to active civic participation.  In this way, students will not simply acquire and produce knowledge but will have the knowledge and skills to engage in the workings of a democracy and practice democratic citizenship.  However, the legislature finds that the department of education has not engaged in systematic teacher training on the new standards nor has addressed the paucity of culturally appropriate materials for historical and civic education. The purpose of this Act is to increase access to civic education in Hawaii's public school system by: (1)  Establishing a Hawaii civic education trust fund for the educational benefit of students in the Hawaii public school system; and (2)  Appropriating funds for the expansion of civic education in public schools. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Hawaii civic education trust fund; established.  (a)  There is established the Hawaii civic education trust fund as a separate fund of the department.  Moneys received from the State or county, private contributions of cash and other property, and the income and capital gains earned by the trust fund shall constitute the trust fund assets.  The department shall be responsible for determining the moneys that would be deposited into the trust fund. (b)  The department shall have the sole responsibility for the administration and expenditure of moneys from the trust fund for the purposes of this section. (c)  The purpose of the trust fund is to serve as a repository for moneys intended for improving, and supporting the programs benefiting, the civic education of the students of the Hawaii public school system. (d)  The aggregate principal sum deposited in the trust fund, and any income and capital gains earned by the trust fund but not expended for grantmaking or administration, shall be invested by the superintendent in the State's investment pool to maximize the rate of return on investment of the trust fund consistent with the objective of preserving the trust fund's principal.  The department shall be allowed to hire investment managers either within or outside of the department. (e)  In the event of the termination of the trust fund, the unspent appropriations made by the State, if any, shall be distributed to EDN100 (department of education, school-based budgeting). (f)  The trust fund may receive contributions, grants, or gifts from corporations or other businesses, foundations, government, individuals, and other interested parties. (g)  The trust fund may receive contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise from all sources.  The public and private sectors shall work together as partners in securing contributions for the trust fund.  The State may allocate moneys to the trust fund by legislative appropriation. (h)  There may be an endowment component of the trust fund, as deemed necessary by the superintendent. (i)  The superintendent shall oversee the administration and expenditure of funds for the following activities: (1)  Grantmaking to raise awareness of the trust fund; (2)  Allocation of funds for the operations of the department; (3)  Allocation of funds for the civic education of the public school students of this State; (4)  Allocation of funds for programs that support the civic education of the public school students of this State; (5)  Allocation of funds for public school facilities and classroom resources relating to civic education; (6)  Allocation of funds for professional development programs relating to civic education; and (7)  Administration of the trust fund.  The department may choose to hire outside of the department to administer the trust fund. (j)  The superintendent shall develop policies, plans, and strategies for the trust fund; publicize the trust fund; and solicit public and private moneys for the trust fund. (k)  For the purposes of this section, "trust fund" or "fund" means the Hawaii civic education trust fund." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $84,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the expansion of civic education in public schools, including professional development and classroom resources related to the Hawaii core standards in social studies. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE) permanent civic education resource teacher positions. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________